apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="ar/x__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cis</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cem</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cum</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cibus</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cibus</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cibus</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tempesta/s__n">
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tem</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tas</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tum</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tibus</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tibus</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tibus</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="systema/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tem</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tas</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tum</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tibus</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tibus</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tibus</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="can/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="av/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibus</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="arx"><i>ar</i><par n="ar/x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tempestas"><i>tempesta</i><par n="tempesta/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="systema"><i>systema</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="unitas"><i>unita</i><par n="tempesta/s__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "acroama" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aenigma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aetas" ><i>aetat</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "altor" ><i>altor</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "anathema" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "approbatio" ><i>approbation</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "Ariobarzanes" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "balatro" ><i>on</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "baptisma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "calamitas" ><i>calamitat</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "calor" ><i>or</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "caulis" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "clavis" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "codex" ><i>ic</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "concretio" ><i>on</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "contritio" ><i>on</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "crinis" ><i>crin</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "declamatio" ><i>on</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "diadema" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "diploma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "direptio" ><i>direption</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "disceptator" ><i>or</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "dogma" ><i>dogma</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ephemeris" ><i>id</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "epigramma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "farrago" ><i>farragin</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "favor" ><i>favor</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "frugalitas" ><i>at</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "Gigas" ><i>ant</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "gramma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "iactatio" ><i>iactation</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "insidiator" ><i>or</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "iurisdictio" ><i>iurisdiction</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "magnes" ><i>et</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mobilitas" ><i>at</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "murmillō" ><i>ōn</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pabulatio" ><i>on</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pastor" ><i>pastor</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "perizoma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "phantasma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "praeco" ><i>on</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "prolapsio" ><i>on</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "quaestor" ><i>quaestor</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "rheuma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "salubritas" ><i>at</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "schema" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sector" ><i>or</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "stigma" ><i>a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "suggestio" ><i>on</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sus" ><i>su</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "toreuma" ><i>—a</i><par n="systema/__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "umor" ><i>or</i><par n="can/is__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "vicinitas" ><i>at</i><par n="av/is__n"/></e>
